Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-721
Contamination; reports required.

Each state agency and political subdivision shall promptly report to the department any information which indicates that contamination is occurring.

Laws 1986, LB 894, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 15;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 46-674.03;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 41;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-656.35;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 61;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 30;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 220.